Montana, session 2025, HB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 1 through 8], the following
definitions apply:
(1) (a) "Alternative nicotine product" means any manufactured noncombustible product containing
nicotine derived from tobacco that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved,
or ingested by any other means. The term includes synthetic nicotine and synthetic nicotine products.
(b) The term does not include a tobacco product, A CIGARETTE AS DEFINED IN 16-11-102 OR 16-11-
402, a vapor product, or a product regulated as a drug or device by the United States food and drug
administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
(2) (a) "Vapor product" means a noncombustible product that may contain nicotine and that uses a
heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means,
regardless of shape or size, to produce vapor from a solution or other substance. The term includes an
electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device and a vapor
cartridge or other container that may contain nicotine in a solution or other form that is intended to be used with
or in an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device.
(b) The term does not include a product regulated as a CIGARETTE AS DEFINED IN 16-11-102 OR 16-
11-402 OR A drug or device by the United States food and drug administration under Chapter V of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. License -- fee -- renewal. (1) A person may not sell alternative nicotine
products or vapor products at retail, whether over the counter, by vending machine, or otherwise, without a
license obtained from the department of revenue.
(2) A license for the retail sale of alternative nicotine products or vapor products may be obtained
from the department of revenue.
(3) An application for a license to sell either alternative nicotine products or vapor products must
be accompanied by a fee of $20. The fee may be paid by credit card and may be discounted for payment
processing charges paid by the department to a third party. The fee collected by the department must be
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
deposited in the general fund.
(4) The license must be renewed annually. Upon payment of the annual fee, the license is
effective for 1 year, without proration, and is not transferable.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Prohibition on sales to persons under 18 years of age -- signs --
age-restricted sales venue. (1) (A) A person may not sell or distribute an alternative nicotine product or vapor
product to an individual under 18 years of age, whether over the counter, by vending machine, or otherwise.
(B) The retail sales of alternative nicotine products or ANY vapor products must be made at
locations that prohibit individuals who are under 18 years of age from entering the premises.
(2) If there is a reasonable doubt as to the individual's age, the seller shall require presentation of
a driver's license or other generally accepted identification that includes a picture of the individual.
(3) If the seller scans a person's government or tribal-issued identification, the seller shall handle
data and metadata from the scan in accordance with 16-3-313.
(4) A retail seller of alternative nicotine products or vapor products shall conspicuously display, at
each place on the premises at which alternative nicotine products or vapor products are displayed and sold, a
sign that is to be provided without charge by the department of revenue that states: "Montana law prohibits the
sale of alternative nicotine products and vapor products to persons under 18 years of age."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Sales of alternative nicotine products or vapor products through
vending machines restricted. (1) Alternative nicotine products and vapor products may be sold through a
vending machine only in places where alcoholic beverages are sold and consumed on the premises and where
the vending machine is under the direct line-of-sight supervision of the owner or an employee of the
establishment. The alternative nicotine products or vapor products must be in a vending machine that contains
only alternative nicotine products or vapor products.
(2) Alternative nicotine products or vapor products may not be sold through a vending machine
that is located in a restaurant unless the restaurant has a bar, the restaurant area shares seating with the bar
area, and the vending machine meets the requirements of subsection (1).
(3) The sale of alternative nicotine products or vapor products from a vending machine under the
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
direct line-of-sight supervision of an owner or employee is considered a sale of alternative nicotine products or
vapor products by the owner or employee for the purposes of [section 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Civil penalties -- license suspension. (1) Failure to obtain a license as
required by [section 2] or failure to post signs as provided in [section 3] is punishable by a civil penalty of $100.
The department may collect the penalty in the manner provided for the collection of other debts.
(2) A person who violates [section 3(1)] or [section 4] at any one location within a 3-year period
shall be punished as follows:
(a) A first through third offense is punishable by a verbal notification of violation.
(b) A fourth offense is punishable by a written notice of violation to be sent by the department of
public health and human services to the owner of the establishment.
(c) A fifth offense is punishable by assessment of a $500 fine against the owner of the
establishment.
(d) A sixth offense is punishable by suspension of the license for 3 months.
(e) A seventh or subsequent offense is punishable by suspension of the license for 1 year.
(3) After 2 years from the first violation, if a person has not received notice of any further violations,
a second violation is considered a first violation for the purposes of subsection (2).
(4) A license may not be reissued after suspension under subsection (2)(d) or (2)(e) unless civil
penalties are paid in full.
(5) Fees assessed pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Inspection and notification of violation required. (1) The department
of public health and human services shall conduct inspections of persons selling or distributing alternative
nicotine products or vapor products to determine compliance with [sections 1 through 8]. Inspections may be
conducted directly by the department of public health and human services or may be provided for by contract
let by the department of public health and human services.
(2) Persons found to be in violation of the requirements of [sections 1 through 8] or the rules of the
department of public health and human services a fourth and subsequent time must be notified in writing by the
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
department of public health and human services of the facts of the violation and the penalties provided by
[sections 1 through 8].
(3) The department of public health and human services shall provide documentation of alleged
violations of [sections 1 through 8] to the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Minors not liable for possession or attempt to purchase. An
individual under 18 years of age assisting in the enforcement of [sections 1 through 8] is not liable under a civil
or criminal law for the possession of or the attempt to purchase an alternative nicotine product or vapor product
for the purposes of enforcing [sections 1 through 8].

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Local regulations. A local government may by ordinance adopt
regulations on the subjects of [sections 1 through 8] that are no more stringent than [sections 1 through 8].

Section 9. Section 7-1-111, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-1-111. Powers denied. A local government unit with self-government powers is prohibited from
exercising the following:
(1) any power that applies to or affects any private or civil relationship, except as an incident to the
exercise of an independent self-government power;
(2) any power that applies to or affects the provisions of 7-33-4128 or Title 39, except that subject
to those provisions, it may exercise any power of a public employer with regard to its employees;
(3) any power that applies to or affects the public school system, except that a local unit may
impose an assessment reasonably related to the cost of any service or special benefit provided by the unit and
shall exercise any power that it is required by law to exercise regarding the public school system;
(4) any power that prohibits the grant or denial of a certificate of compliance or a certificate of
public convenience and necessity pursuant to Title 69, chapter 12;
(5) any power that establishes a rate or price otherwise determined by a state agency;
(6) any power that applies to or affects any determination of the department of environmental
quality with regard to any mining plan, permit, or contract;
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
(7) any power that applies to or affects any determination by the department of environmental
quality with regard to a certificate of compliance;
(8) any power that defines as an offense conduct made criminal by state statute, that defines an
offense as a felony, or that fixes the penalty or sentence for a misdemeanor in excess of a fine of $500, 6
months' imprisonment, or both, except as specifically authorized by statute;
(9) any power that applies to or affects the right to keep or bear arms;
(10) any power that applies to or affects a public employee's pension or retirement rights as
established by state law, except that a local government may establish additional pension or retirement
systems;
(11) any power that applies to or affects the standards of professional or occupational competence
established pursuant to Title 37 as prerequisites to the carrying on of a profession or occupation;
(12) except as provided in 7-3-1105, 7-3-1222, 7-21-3214, or 7-31-4110, any power that applies to
or affects Title 75, chapter 7, part 1, or Title 87;
(13) (a) any power that applies to or affects landlords, as defined in 70-24-103 and 70-33-103, when
that power is intended to license landlords or to regulate their activities with regard to tenants beyond what is
provided in Title 70, chapters 24, 25, and 33; or
(b) any power to deviate from or add to the exclusive application of the provisions of:
(i) the Montana Residential Landlord and Tenant Act of 1977, Title 70, chapter 24;
(ii) residential tenants' security deposit law in Title 70, chapter 25; or
(iii) the Montana Residential Mobile Home Lot Rental Act, Title 70, chapter 33.
(14) subject to 7-32-4304, any power to enact ordinances prohibiting or penalizing vagrancy;
(15) subject to 80-10-110, any power to regulate the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage,
distribution, use, or application of commercial fertilizers or soil amendments, except that a local government
may enter into a cooperative agreement with the department of agriculture concerning the use and application
of commercial fertilizers or soil amendments. This subsection is not intended to prevent or restrict a local
government from adopting or implementing zoning regulations or fire codes governing the physical location or
siting of fertilizer manufacturing, storage, and sales facilities.
(16) subject to 80-5-136(10), any power to regulate the cultivation, harvesting, production,
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
processing, sale, storage, transportation, distribution, possession, use, and planting of agricultural seeds or
vegetable seeds as defined in 80-5-120. This subsection is not intended to prevent or restrict a local
government from adopting or implementing zoning regulations or building codes governing the physical location
or siting of agricultural or vegetable seed production, processing, storage, sales, marketing, transportation, or
distribution facilities.
(17) any power that prohibits the operation of a mobile amateur radio station from a motor vehicle,
including while the vehicle is in motion, that is operated by a person who holds an unrevoked and unexpired
official amateur radio station license and operator's license, "technician" or higher class, issued by the federal
communications commission of the United States;
(18) subject to 76-2-240 and 76-2-340, any power that prevents the erection of an amateur radio
antenna at heights and dimensions sufficient to accommodate amateur radio service communications by a
person who holds an unrevoked and unexpired official amateur radio station license and operator's license,
"technician" or higher class, issued by the federal communications commission of the United States;
(19) any power to require a fee and a permit for the movement of a vehicle, combination of vehicles,
load, object, or other thing of a size exceeding the maximum specified in 61-10-101 through 61-10-104 on a
highway that is under the jurisdiction of an entity other than the local government unit;
(20) any power to enact an ordinance governing the private use of an unmanned aerial vehicle in
relation to a wildfire;
(21) any power as prohibited in 7-1-121(2) affecting, applying to, or regulating the use, disposition,
sale, prohibitions, fees, charges, or taxes on auxiliary containers, as defined in 7-1-121(4);
(22) any power that provides for fees, taxation, or penalties based on carbon or carbon use in
accordance with 7-1-116;
(23) any power to require an employer, other than the local government unit itself, to provide an
employee or class of employees with a wage or employment benefit that is not required by state or federal law;
(24) any power to enact an ordinance prohibited in 7-5-103 or a resolution prohibited in 7-5-121 and
any power to bring a retributive action against a private business owner as prohibited in 7-5-103(2)(d)(iv) and 7-
5-121(2)(c)(iv);
(25) any power to prohibit the sale of alternative nicotine products or vapor products as provided in
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
16-11-313(1) [section 8];
(26) any power to control the amount of rent charged for private residential or commercial property.
Private residential property does not include property in which the local government unit has a property interest
or in which the local government unit has an interest through a housing authority.
(27) any power to require additional licensing when the state is the original issuer of the license;
(28) any power to prohibit or impede the connection or reconnection of an electric, natural gas,
propane, or other energy or utility service provided by a public utility, municipal utility, cooperative utility, or
other energy or fuel provider;
(29) any power to prohibit the purchase or use of any fuel derived from petroleum, including but not
limited to methane, propane, gasoline, and diesel fuel, or the installation or use of any vehicles, vessels, tools,
or commercial and residential appliances that burn or transport petroleum fuels; or
(30) any power to require that buildings be constructed to have solar panels or wiring, batteries, or
other equipment for solar panels or electric vehicles."

Section 10. Section 16-11-122, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-122. License fees -- renewal. (1) Each application for a wholesaler's license or a tobacco
product vendor's license must be accompanied by a fee of $50.
(2) Each application for a subjobber's license must be accompanied by a fee of $50.
(3) Each application for a retailer's license must be accompanied by a fee of $50.
(4) Each application for a license to sell either alternative nicotine products or vapor products must
be accompanied by a fee of $20.
(5)(4) The fees for the licenses in subsections (2) and (3) may be paid by credit card and may be
discounted for payment processing charges paid by the department to a third party.
(6)(5) These licenses must be renewed annually on or before the anniversary date established by
rule by the board of review established in 30-16-302 and upon payment of the annual fee are effective for 1
year, without proration, and are not transferable."

Section 11. Section 16-11-302, MCA, is amended to read:
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
"16-11-302. Definitions. For the purposes of 16-11-301 through 16-11-308, the following definitions
apply:
(1) (a) "Alternative nicotine product" means any manufactured noncombustible product containing
nicotine derived from tobacco that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved,
or ingested by any other means.
(b) The term does not include a tobacco product, a vapor product, or a product regulated as a drug
or device by the United States food and drug administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act.
(2)(1) "Distribute" means:
(a) to give, deliver, sample, or sell;
(b) to offer to give, deliver, sample, or sell; or
(c) to cause or hire another person to give, deliver, sample, or sell or offer to give, deliver, sample,
or sell.
(3)(2) "Health warning" means a tobacco product label required by federal law and intended to alert
users of the product to the health risks associated with tobacco use. The term includes warning labels required
under the Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act and the Comprehensive Smokeless Tobacco Health
Education Act of 1986.
(4)(3) "License" means a retail tobacco product sales license.
(5)(4) "Person" means a natural person, company, corporation, firm, partnership, organization, or
other legal entity.
(6)(5) (a) "Tobacco product" means a substance intended for human consumption that contains
tobacco. The term includes cigarettes, cigars, snuff, smoking tobacco, and smokeless tobacco.
(b) The term does not include an alternative nicotine product, a vapor product, or a product
regulated as a drug or device by the United States food and drug administration under Chapter V of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
(7) (a) "Vapor product" means a noncombustible product that may contain nicotine and that uses a
heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means,
regardless of shape or size, to produce vapor from a solution or other substance. The term includes an
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device and a vapor
cartridge or other container that may contain nicotine in a solution or other form that is intended to be used with
or in an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device.
(b) The term does not include a product regulated as a drug or device by the United States food
and drug administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act."

Section 12. Section 16-11-303, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-303. License for retail sale of tobacco products -- alternative nicotine products -- vapor
products. (1) A person may not sell tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products at retail,
whether over the counter, by vending machine, or otherwise, without a license obtained from the department of
revenue.
(2) A license for the retail sale of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products
may be obtained from the department of revenue.
(3) The fee collected by the department must be deposited in the general fund."

Section 13. Section 16-11-304, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-304. Signs. A retail seller of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products
shall conspicuously display, at each place on the premises at which tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products are displayed and sold, a sign that is to be provided without charge by the
department of revenue that states: "Montana law prohibits the sale of tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, and vapor products to persons under 18 years of age.""

Section 14. Section 16-11-305, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-305. Sale or distribution of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor
products to persons under 18 years of age prohibited. (1) A person may not sell or distribute a tobacco
product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product to an individual under 18 years of age, whether over the
counter, by vending machine, or otherwise.
(2) If there is a reasonable doubt as to the individual's age, the seller shall require presentation of
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
a driver's license or other generally accepted identification that includes a picture of the individual.
(3) If the seller scans a person's government or tribal-issued identification, the seller shall handle
data and metadata from the scan in accordance with 16-3-313."

Section 15. Section 16-11-306, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-306. Sales of tobacco, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products through vending
machines restricted. (1) Tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor products may be sold
through a vending machine only in places where alcoholic beverages are sold and consumed on the premises
and where the vending machine is under the direct line-of-sight supervision of the owner or an employee of the
establishment. The tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products must be in a vending
machine that contains only tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.
(2) Tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products may not be sold through a
vending machine that is located in a restaurant unless the restaurant has a bar, the restaurant area shares
seating with the bar area, and the vending machine meets the requirements of subsection (1).
(3) The sale of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products from a vending
machine under the direct line-of-sight supervision of an owner or employee is considered a sale of tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products by the owner or employee for the purposes of 16-11-
305."

Section 16. Section 16-11-308, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-308. Civil penalties -- license suspension -- tobacco education fee. (1) Failure to obtain a
license, as required by 16-11-303, failure to post signs, as provided in 16-11-304, or the manufacture or sale of
cigarettes or rolling tobacco in violation of the minimum package size requirements of 16-11-111 or 16-11-307
is punishable by a civil penalty of $100. The department may collect the penalty in the manner provided for the
collection of other debts.
(2) A person who violates 16-11-305(1) or 16-11-307(1) at any one location within a 3-year period
shall be punished as follows:
(a) A first through third offense is punishable by a verbal notification of violation.
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
(b) A fourth offense is punishable by a written notice of violation to be sent by the department of
public health and human services to the owner of the establishment.
(c) A fifth offense is punishable by assessment against the owner of the establishment of a
tobacco education fee of $500. The employee or other person who sold the tobacco product, alternative
nicotine product, or vapor product, the establishment manager, and the establishment owner, if the owner is a
sole proprietor or partner, shall read and view the tobacco education material.
(d) A sixth offense under 16-11-305(1) or 16-11-307(1) or a third offense under 16-11-307(2) is
punishable by suspension of the licenses required by 16-11-120 and 16-11-303 for 3 months.
(e) A seventh and subsequent offense under 16-11-305(1) or 16-11-307(1) or a fourth and
subsequent offense under 16-11-307(2) is punishable by suspension of the licenses required by 16-11-120 and
16-11-303 for 1 year.
(3) After 2 years from the first violation, if a person has not received notice of any further violations,
a second violation is considered a first violation for the purposes of subsection (2).
(4) A license may not be reissued after suspension under subsection (2)(d) or (2)(e) unless
tobacco education fees or civil penalties are paid in full.
(5) Tobacco education fees must be assessed and collected by the department of public health
and human services. Notice of an assessment pursuant to subsection (2) and this subsection must be made by
the department of public health and human services within 30 days of the alleged violation by certified letter
addressed to the establishment owner or manager. The notice of assessment against the owner of the
establishment must provide an opportunity for a hearing. The hearing may be conducted using electronic
equipment and must comply with the provisions of the Montana Administrative Procedure Act. Within 30 days
from the date on which the notice of assessment was mailed, the owner or manager shall notify the department
of public health and human services that the owner or manager objects to the assessment and request a
hearing pursuant to this subsection.
(6) In addition to the penalty provided for in subsection (2), a first and subsequent violation of 16-
11-305(1) or 16-11-307(1) is punishable by an assessment of a tobacco education fee of $25 against the
employee who sold the tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product if the employee is not the
owner of the establishment. The tobacco education fee must be assessed and collected by the department of
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
public health and human services. Within 30 days of the alleged violation, notice of assessment pursuant to this
subsection must be made by the department of public health and human services by certified letter addressed
to the employee. The notice of assessment must provide an opportunity for a hearing. The hearing may be
conducted using electronic equipment and must comply with the provisions of the Montana Administrative
Procedure Act. Within 30 days from the date on which the notice of assessment was mailed, the employee shall
notify the department of public health and human services that the employee objects to the assessment and
requests a hearing pursuant to this subsection.
(7) The tobacco education material referred to in this section must be provided by the department
of public health and human services in the form of written and video self-teaching materials. The education
materials may be used only for the purposes provided in this section. Upon completion of the self-teaching
materials, the establishment owner or manager shall execute a written statement on a form provided by the
department of public health and human services verifying that the employee, owner, or manager, as
appropriate, has read and viewed the self-teaching material and shall return the statement and the self-teaching
video to the department of public health and human services.
(8) Upon the sixth and subsequent violation of this section, the department of public health and
human services shall notify the department of revenue in writing to initiate suspension of the licenses required
by 16-11-120 and 16-11-303 and shall notify the licensee in writing of the alleged violation and of the referral of
the licensee's record of violations to the department of revenue for suspension of the licenses pursuant to 16-
11-144 and this section. The department of revenue shall review the record of violations and may initiate
license suspension proceedings in accordance with 16-11-144. If, upon a review of the record of violations, the
department of revenue declines to initiate suspension proceedings, the violation may not be charged against
the licensee for the purposes of this section.
(9) Fees assessed pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state general fund."

Section 17. Section 16-11-309, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-309. Inspection and notification of violation required. (1) The department of public health
and human services shall conduct inspections of persons selling or distributing tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products to determine compliance with 16-11-303, 16-11-304, 16-11-305(1), 16-11-
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
306, and 16-11-307. Inspections may be conducted directly by the department of public health and human
services or may be provided for by contract let by the department of public health and human services. Persons
found to be in violation of the requirements of this part or the rules of the department of public health and
human services a fourth and subsequent time must be notified in writing by the department of public health and
human services of the facts of the violation and the penalties provided by this part.
(2) The department of public health and human services shall provide documentation of alleged
violations of 16-11-303, 16-11-305, and 16-11-307 to the department of revenue."

Section 18. Section 16-11-310, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-310. Minors not liable for possession or attempt to purchase. An individual under 18
years of age assisting in the enforcement of this part is not liable under a civil or criminal law for the possession
of or the attempt to purchase a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product for the purposes
of enforcing this part."

Section 19. Section 16-11-311, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-311. Local regulations. A local government may by ordinance adopt regulations on the
subjects of 16-11-301 through 16-11-308, including alternative nicotine or vapor products as provided in 16-11-
313, that are no more stringent than 16-11-301 through 16-11-308 and 16-11-313. This section does not apply
to regulations affecting alternative nicotine products or vapor products as provided in [sections 1 through 8]."

Section 20. Section 30-16-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"30-16-301. Business registration and licensing plan -- administration. (1) The provisions of 16-
11-120, 16-11-122, [section 2], 30-12-203, 30-16-104, 50-50-201, 50-50-203, 50-50-205, 50-50-207, 50-50-
214, 50-57-201 through 50-57-206, 50-57-208, 80-7-106, 81-9-201, 81-20-201, and 82-15-105 constitute a
means of implementing a preliminary plan for streamlined registration and licensing procedures. Sections 16-
11-120, 16-11-122, 30-12-203, 30-16-104, 50-50-201, 50-50-203, 50-50-205, 50-50-207, 50-50-214, 50-57-201
through 50-57-206, 50-57-208, 80-7-106, 81-9-201, 81-20-201, and 82-15-105 provide that certain licenses
selected by the board of review must allow for:
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
(a) an anniversary date for license renewal that is set by the board of review;
(b) an electronic means of verifying the information required in the license application; and
(c) payment of fees required for licensure by credit card, debit card, or other commercially
acceptable means as provided in 15-1-231.
(2) The department shall designate an employee in charge of administering the plan whose duties
include those of executive secretary of the board of review."

Section 21. Section 45-5-623, MCA, is amended to read:
"45-5-623. Unlawful transactions with children. (1) Except as provided for in 16-6-305, a person
commits the offense of unlawful transactions with children if the person knowingly:
(a) sells or gives explosives to a child except as authorized under appropriate city ordinances;
(b) sells or gives intoxicating substances other than alcoholic beverages to a child;
(c) sells or gives an alcoholic beverage to a person under 21 years of age;
(d) sells or gives to a child a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product, as
defined in 16-11-302, or an alternative nicotine or vapor product, as defined in [section 1];
(e) sells or gives to a child a synthetic marijuana product, as defined in 16-12-102;
(f) being a junk dealer, pawnbroker, or secondhand dealer, receives or purchases goods from a
child without authorization of the parent or guardian; or
(g) tattoos or provides a body piercing on a child without the explicit in-person consent of the
child's parent or guardian. For purposes of this subsection (1)(g), "tattoo" and "body piercing" have the meaning
provided in 50-48-102. Failure to adequately verify the identity of a parent or guardian is not an excuse for
violation of this subsection (1)(g).
(2) A person convicted of the offense of unlawful transactions with children shall be fined an
amount not to exceed $500 or be imprisoned in the county jail for any term not to exceed 6 months, or both. A
person convicted of a second offense of unlawful transactions with children shall be fined an amount not to
exceed $1,000 or be imprisoned in the county jail for any term not to exceed 6 months, or both. (See compiler's
comments for contingent termination of certain text.)"

- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3
Section 22. Section 45-5-637, MCA, is amended to read:
"45-5-637. Possession or consumption of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or
vapor products by persons under 18 years of age prohibited -- unlawful attempt to purchase --
penalties. (1) A person under 18 years of age who knowingly possesses or consumes a tobacco product,
alternative nicotine product, or vapor product, as defined in 16-11-302, or an alternative nicotine product or
vapor product, as defined in [section 1], commits the offense of possession or consumption of a tobacco
product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product.
(2) A person convicted of possession or consumption of a tobacco product, alternative nicotine
product, or vapor product:
(a) shall be fined $50 for a first offense, no less than $75 or more than $100 for a second offense,
and no less than $100 or more than $250 for a third or subsequent offense; or
(b) may be adjudicated on a petition alleging the person to be a youth in need of intervention under
the provisions of the Montana Youth Court Act provided for in Title 41, chapter 5.
(3) A person convicted of possession or consumption of a tobacco product, alternative nicotine
product, or vapor product may also be required to perform community service or to attend a tobacco cessation
program.
(4) A person under 18 years of age commits the offense of attempt to purchase a tobacco product,
alternative nicotine product, or vapor product if the person knowingly attempts to purchase a tobacco product,
alternative nicotine product, or vapor product, as defined in 16-11-302, or an alternative nicotine product or
vapor product, as defined in [section 1]. A person convicted of attempt to purchase a tobacco product,
alternative nicotine product, or vapor product:
(a) for a first offense, shall be fined $50 and may be ordered to perform community service;
(b) for a second or subsequent offense, shall be fined an amount not to exceed $100 and may be
ordered to perform community service.
(5) The fines collected under subsections (2) and (4) must be deposited to the credit of the general
fund of the local government that employs the arresting officer, or if the arresting officer is an officer of the
highway patrol, the fines must be credited to the county general fund in the county in which the arrest was
made."
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0149.3

Section 23. Section 50-50-207, MCA, is amended to read:
"50-50-207. Expiration date of license. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), licenses expire on
December 31 following the date of issue unless canceled for cause.
(2) License renewals provided for in 16-11-122, [section 2], 30-12-203(5)(a), 50-50-201, 80-7-106,
and 82-15-105 expire on the anniversary date established by rule by the board of review established in 30-16-
302."

NEW SECTION. Section 24. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is
repealed:
16-11-313. Alternative nicotine products and vapor products -- local ordinance or resolution -- prohibition.

NEW SECTION. Section 25. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 8] are intended to be
codified as a new chapter in Title 16, and the provisions of Title 16 apply to [sections 1 through 8].
- END -
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 149